District of Columbia statutes.
50-1401.05

Limited purpose driver’s license, permit, or identification card.

(a)

The Mayor, consistent with subsections (b) and (c) of this section, shall issue a limited purpose driver’s license, permit, or identification card to an applicant who:

(1)

Has resided in the District for longer than 6 months;

(2)

(A)

Has not been assigned a social security number;

(B)

Has been assigned a social security number but cannot establish legal presence in the United States at the time of application; or

(C)

Is ineligible to obtain a social security number; and

(3)

Meets the requirements of this section.

(b)

(1)

To obtain a limited purpose driver’s license or permit in accordance with subsection (a) of this section, an applicant shall:

(A)

Provide, under penalty of perjury, proof of identity, date of birth, and residency to the Department of Motor Vehicles (“Department”) as defined by the Department by rule; and

(B)

Satisfy the applicable requirements of § 50-1401.01 and sections 100 through 111 of Title 18 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (18 DCMR §§ 100-111); provided, that the Mayor shall not require an applicant for a limited purpose driver’s license or permit under this section to provide a social security number or any document to prove the absence of a social security number.

(2)

An applicant shall include a certified translation of a document provided that is not in English.

(c)

To obtain a limited purpose identification card in accordance with subsection (a) of this section, an applicant shall:

(1)

Meet the requirements of subsection (b)(1)(A) of this section; and

(2)

Meet the applicable requirements of section 112 of Title 18 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (18 DCMR § 112); provided, that the Mayor shall not require an applicant for a limited purpose identification card under this section to provide a social security number or any document to prove the absence of a social security number.

(d)

A limited purpose driver’s license or identification card issued under subsection (a) of this section shall be valid for 8 years. A limited purpose learner’s or provisional permit shall be valid for the time period as set forth in §§ 50-1401.01(a)(2) and 50-1401.01(a)(2A).

(e)

An individual who is issued a limited purpose driver’s license or permit under this section shall have the equivalent authorization to operate a motor vehicle as provided in § 50-1401.01 and shall be subject to all statutory and regulatory provisions pertaining to driver licensing and operation of a motor vehicle.

(f)

(1)

A limited purpose driver’s license, permit, or identification card issued under subsection (a) of this section shall state the following on the face of the card and in its machine-readable zone in a font size no larger than the smallest font size otherwise appearing on the card: “Not valid for official federal purposes.”

(2)

The Mayor may incorporate different features but only if doing so would result in a card that appears more similar to a license issued under § 50-1401.01, or if required by the Department of Homeland Security; provided, that the Mayor does so to the minimum extent necessary to comply.

(g)

A limited purpose driver’s license, permit, or identification card issued under subsection (a) of this section shall not be used to consider an individual’s citizenship or immigration status, or as a basis for a criminal investigation, arrest, or detention.

(h)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this section. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

Mar. 3, 1925, ch. 443, § 8c
as added Jan. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-62, § 2(c), 60 DCR 16026
Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-145, § 2, 61 DCR 8061
This section is referenced in § 50-1401.01 and § 50-1401.01b.
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-62 added this section.
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-145, in (a)(2), added the subdivision (a)(2)(A) and (a)(2)(C) designations; and added (a)(2)(B).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Driver's Safety Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-111, June 21, 2014, 61 DCR 4326).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Driver’s Safety Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-293, March 12, 2014, 61 DCR 2435).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 2 and 3 of the Driver’s Safety Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-350, June 17, 2014, 61 DCR 6326).
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-62: Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-62 provided that the act shall apply as of May 1, 2014.